Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.130

Rules—Adjustment of controversies.

(1) The director shall adopt rules not inconsistent with this chapter for the purpose of enforcing and administering this chapter.

(2) The director shall investigate and attempt to adjust equitably controversies between farm labor contractors and their workers with respect to claims arising under this chapter.

[ 1985 c 280 s 11; 1955 c 392 s 14.]